Massachusetts, session 194th, H2587.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, there shall
be a commission to study municipal emergency medical service staffing levels and workforce
development.
(b) The commission shall consist of 15 members: the chairs of the joint committee on
public safety and homeland security or their designees, who shall serve as co-chairs; the chairs of
the joint committee on public service or their designees; the state fire marshal or a designee; the
director of the office of emergency medical services or a designee; 2 members appointed by the
Professional Fire Fighters of Massachusetts; 2 members appointed by the Fire Chiefs Association
of Massachusetts; 2 members appointed by the Massachusetts Health and Hospital Association,
Inc; 1 member representing the Massachusetts Health Care Workforce Center; 1 member
of 2

representing the State Office of Rural Health; and 1 member appointed by the Massachusetts
Municipal Association.
(c) The commission shall: (i) evaluate the current effectiveness and efficiency of
municipal-based emergency medical service staffing, including an assessment of call volume,
response times, ambulance transport times, turnaround times for ambulances at hospitals, and
wait times for ambulances at hospitals; (ii) explore the current challenges facing the emergency
medical service workforce, including operational inefficiencies, staffing shortages, training
needs, and retention; (iii) review current emergency medical service and fire service workforce
development programs; and (iv) recommend changes to streamline the workforce, enhance
service delivery, and set standard staffing levels for services, as well as identify best practices in
workforce development to promote new member engagement, retention, and training.
(d) The commission shall submit a report of its study and recommendations, together
with any proposed legislation, to the chairs of the joint committee on public safety and homeland
security and the clerks of the house of representatives and senate no later than March 1, 2026.
of 2